New Jersey, session 221, S3734.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.         A holder of a Class 5 Cannabis Retailer license, licensed pursuant to P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.), may sell non-intoxicating food and beverage products, whether or not manufactured in this State. b.    The holder of a Class 5 Cannabis Retailer license who sells non-intoxicating products in accordance with subsection a. of this section shall not sell non-intoxicating foods or beverages in excess of thirty percent of the stores annual gross revenues, except that the limitation on annual gross revenues shall not apply to the sale of coffee or water by the Class 5 Retailer. c.     The Cannabis Regulatory Commission may adopt rules and regulations, in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as necessary to implement this act. 2. This act shall take effect immediately.